Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-3409
Insurable interest; coverage by program.

(1) A program shall have an insurable interest in a vehicle during the sharing period.

(2) Nothing in this section shall impose liability on a program to maintain the coverage required by section 60-3403 or 60-3404.

(3) A program may own and maintain as the named insured one or more policies of motor vehicle liability insurance that provides coverage for:

(a) Liabilities assumed by the program under an agreement;

(b) Liability of an owner or driver; or

(c) Damage or loss to a vehicle.

Laws 2024, LB1073, § 9.